Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB416.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.39-020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this subtitle:
(1) "Added reparation benefits" mean benefits provided by optional added reparation
insurance;[.]
(2) "Basic reparation benefits" mean benefits providing reimbursement for net loss
suffered through injury arising out of the operation, maintenance, or use of a motor
vehicle, subject, where applicable, to the limits, deductibles, exclusions,
disqualifications, and other conditions provided in this subtitle. The maximum
amount of basic reparation benefits payable for all economic loss resulting from
injury to any one (1) person as the result of one (1) accident shall be ten thousand
dollars ($10,000), regardless of the number of persons entitled to such benefits or
the number of providers of security obligated to pay such benefits. Basic reparation
benefits consist of one (1) or more of the elements defined as "loss[.]";
(3) "Basic reparation insured" means:
(a) A person identified by name as an insured in a contract of basic reparation
insurance complying with this subtitle; and
(b) While residing in the same household with a named insured, the following
persons not identified by name as an insured in any other contract of basic
reparation insurance complying with this subtitle: a spouse or other relative of
a named insured; and a minor in the custody of a named insured or of a
relative residing in the same household with the named insured if he usually
makes his home in the same family unit, even though he temporarily lives
elsewhere;[.]
(4) "Injury" and "injury to person" mean bodily harm, sickness, disease, or death;[.]
(5) "Loss" means accrued economic loss consisting only of medical expense, work
Page 1 of 8
HB041610.100 - 840 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:39 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 416/GA
loss, replacement services loss, and, if injury causes death, survivor's economic loss
and survivor's replacement services loss. Noneconomic detriment is not loss.
However, economic loss is loss although caused by pain and suffering or physical
impairment.
(a) 1. "Medical expense" means reasonable charges incurred for reasonably
needed products, services, and accommodations, including those for
medical care, physical rehabilitation, rehabilitative occupational
training, licensed ambulance services, and other remedial treatment and
care. "Medical expense" may include non-medical remedial treatment
rendered in accordance with a recognized religious method of healing.
The term includes a total charge not in excess of five thousand dollars
($5,000)[one thousand dollars ($1,000)] per person for expenses in any
way related to funeral, cremation, and burial. It does not include that
portion of a charge for a room in a hospital, clinic, convalescent or
nursing home, or any other institution engaged in providing nursing care
and related services, in excess of a reasonable and customary charge for
semi-private accommodations, unless intensive care is medically
required. "Medical expense" shall include all healing arts professions
licensed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
2. a. A medical expense, other than care provided in a hospital or
hospital-owned outpatient facility, paid pursuant to this subtitle
shall not exceed the maximum fee allowed or listed for that
expense on the relevant schedule of fees established pursuant to
KRS 342.035 that is in effect at the time the medical expense is
incurred. Other requirements, terms, or conditions imposed
under or associated with the relevant schedule of fees established
pursuant to KRS 342.035 shall not apply to this subtitle.
Page 2 of 8
HB041610.100 - 840 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:39 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 416/GA
b. Subdivision a. of this subparagraph shall not be construed as
making basic reparation benefits or added reparation benefits
primary.
3. Solely for the purpose of basic reparation benefits and added
reparation benefits, there shall be a presumption that any medical
expense[bill] submitted in accordance with this paragraph is
reasonable.
(b) "Work loss" means loss of income from work the injured person would
probably have performed if he had not been injured, and expenses reasonably
incurred by him in obtaining services in lieu of those he would have
performed for income, reduced by any income from substitute work actually
performed by him.
(c) "Replacement services loss" means expenses reasonably incurred in obtaining
ordinary and necessary services in lieu of those the injured person would have
performed, not for income but for the benefit of himself or his family, if he
had not been injured.
(d) "Survivor's economic loss" means loss after decedent's death of contributions
of things of economic value to his survivors, not including services they
would have received from the decedent if he had not suffered the fatal injury,
less expenses of the survivors avoided by reason of decedent's death.
(e) "Survivor's replacement services loss" means expenses reasonably incurred by
survivors after decedent's death in obtaining ordinary and necessary services
in lieu of those the decedent would have performed for their benefit if he had
not suffered the fatal injury, less expenses of the survivors avoided by reason
of the decedent's death and not subtracted in calculating survivor's economic
loss;[.]
(6) "Use of a motor vehicle" means any utilization of the motor vehicle as a vehicle
Page 3 of 8
HB041610.100 - 840 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:39 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 416/GA
including occupying, entering into, and alighting from it. It does not include:
(a) Conduct within the course of a business of repairing, servicing, or otherwise
maintaining motor vehicles unless the conduct occurs off the business
premises; or
(b) Conduct in the course of loading and unloading the vehicle unless the conduct
occurs while occupying, entering into, or alighting from it;[.]
(7) "Motor vehicle" means any vehicle which transports persons or property upon the
public highways of the Commonwealth, propelled by other than muscular power
except road rollers, road graders, farm tractors, vehicles on which power shovels
are mounted, such other construction equipment customarily used only on the site
of construction and which is not practical for the transportation of persons or
property upon the highways, such vehicles as travel exclusively upon rails, and such
vehicles as are propelled by electrical power obtained from overhead wires while
being operated within any municipality or where said vehicles do not travel more
than five (5) miles beyond the said limits of any municipality. "Motor vehicle"
shall not mean moped as defined in this section or an electric low-speed scooter as
defined in KRS 189.010;[.]
(8) "Moped" means either a motorized bicycle whose frame design may include one (1)
or more horizontal crossbars supporting a fuel tank so long as it also has pedals, or
a motorized bicycle with a step-through type frame which may or may not have
pedals rated no more than two (2) brake horsepower, a cylinder capacity not
exceeding fifty (50) cubic centimeters, an automatic transmission not requiring
clutching or shifting by the operator after the drive system is engaged, and capable
of a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour;[.]
(9) "Public roadway" means a way open to the use of the public for purposes of motor
vehicle travel;[.]
(10) "Net loss" means loss less benefits or advantages, from sources other than basic and
Page 4 of 8
HB041610.100 - 840 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:39 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 416/GA
added reparation insurance, required to be subtracted from loss in calculating net
loss;[.]
(11) "Noneconomic detriment" means pain, suffering, inconvenience, physical
impairment, and other nonpecuniary damages recoverable under the tort law of this
Commonwealth. The term does not include punitive or exemplary damages;[.]
(12) "Owner" means a person, other than a lienholder or secured party, who owns or has
title to a motor vehicle or is entitled to the use and possession of a motor vehicle
subject to a security interest held by another person. The term does not include a
lessee under a lease not intended as security;[.]
(13) "Reparation obligor" means an insurer, self-insurer, or obligated government
providing basic or added reparation benefits under this subtitle;[.]
(14) "Survivor" means a person identified in KRS 411.130 as one entitled to receive
benefits by reason of the death of another person;[.]
(15) A "user" means a person who resides in a household in which any person owns or
maintains a motor vehicle;[.]
(16) "Maintaining a motor vehicle" means having legal custody, possession or
responsibility for a motor vehicle by one other than an owner or operator; and[.]
(17) "Security" means any continuing undertaking complying with this subtitle, for
payment of tort liabilities, basic reparation benefits, and all other obligations
imposed by this subtitle.
Section 2. KRS 304.39-130 is amended to read as follows:
Basic reparation benefits payable for work loss, survivor's economic loss, replacement
services loss, and survivor's replacement services loss arising from injury to one (1)
person and attributable to the calendar week during which the accident causing injury
occurs and to each calendar week thereafter may not exceed five hundred dollars
($500)[two hundred dollars ($200)], prorated for any lesser period. If the injured person's
earnings or work are seasonal or irregular, the weekly limit shall be equitably adjusted or
Page 5 of 8
HB041610.100 - 840 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:39 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 416/GA
apportioned on an annual basis.
Section 3. KRS 304.39-210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Basic and added reparation benefits are payable monthly as loss accrues.
(b) Loss accrues not when injury occurs, but as work loss, replacement services
loss, or medical expense is incurred.
(c) Benefits are overdue if not paid within thirty (30) days after the reparation
obligor receives reasonable proof of the fact and amount of loss realized,
unless the reparation obligor elects to accumulate claims for periods not
exceeding thirty-one (31) days after the reparation obligor receives reasonable
proof of the fact and amount of loss realized, and pays them within fifteen
(15) days after the period of accumulation.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, benefits are not
overdue if a reparation obligor has not made payment to a provider of services
due to the request of a secured person when the secured person is directing the
payment of benefits among the different elements of loss.
(e) If reasonable proof is supplied as to only part of a claim, and the part totals
one hundred dollars ($100) or more, the part is overdue if not paid within the
time provided by this section.
(f) Medical expense benefits may be paid by the reparation obligor directly to
persons supplying products, services, or accommodations to the claimant, if
the claimant so designates.
(g) A reparation obligor shall not, in any event, pay a charge for a medical
expense that exceeds the maximum fee permitted under subsection (5)(a)2.
of Section 1 of this Act.
(h) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, a person
providing a product, service, or accommodation shall submit a
statement of the charge for the medical expense within one hundred
Page 6 of 8
HB041610.100 - 840 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:39 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 416/GA
eighty (180) days of the date the product, service, or accommodation is
rendered.
2. Subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall not apply to:
a. A hospital;
b. Any other provider of emergency care or inpatient services
rendered to a basic or added reparation insured in a hospital; or
c. Charges submitted pursuant to KRS 304.39-241.
(i) A person providing a product, service, or accommodation shall not:
1. Knowingly collect, attempt to collect, coerce, or attempt to coerce,
directly or indirectly, the payment of any charge for a medical expense
covered by a reparation obligor that exceeds the maximum fee
permitted under subsection (5)(a)2. of Section 1 of this Act; or
2. Cause the credit of any basic or added reparation insured to be
impaired by reason of the insured's failure or refusal to pay the
balance of any charge for a medical expense covered by a reparation
obligor that exceeds the maximum fee permitted under subsection
(5)(a)2. of Section 1 of this Act.
(2) Overdue payments bear interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum,
except that if delay was without reasonable foundation, the rate of interest shall be
eighteen percent (18%) per annum.
(3) (a) A claim for basic or added reparation benefits shall be paid without deduction
for the benefits which are to be subtracted pursuant to the provisions on
calculation of net loss if these benefits have not been paid to the claimant
before the reparation benefits are overdue or the claim is paid.
(b) The reparation obligor is entitled to reimbursement from the person obligated
to make the payments or from the claimant who actually receives the
payments.
Page 7 of 8
HB041610.100 - 840 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:39 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 416/GA
(4) (a) A reparation obligor may bring an action to recover benefits which are not
payable, but are in fact paid, because of an intentional misrepresentation of a
material fact, upon which the reparation obligor relies, by the insured or by a
person providing an item of medical expense.
(b) The action may be brought only against the person providing the item of
medical expense, unless the insured has intentionally misrepresented the facts
or knows of the misrepresentation.
(c) An insurer may offset amounts he is entitled to recover from the insured under
this subsection against any basic or added reparation benefits otherwise due.
(5) (a) A reparation obligor who rejects a claim for basic reparation benefits shall
give to the claimant prompt written notice of the rejection, specifying the
reason.
(b) If a claim is rejected for a reason other than that the person is not entitled to
the basic reparation benefits claimed, the written notice shall inform the
claimant that he may file his claim with the assigned claims bureau and shall
give the name and address of the bureau.
Page 8 of 8
HB041610.100 - 840 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:39 PM GA